Hawaii statutes.
§286‑117 Duplicate permits, provisional
licenses, and licenses. The holder of an instruction permit, provisional
license, or driver's license may upon payment of the reasonable cost of its
issuance obtain a duplicate; provided that the holder shall surrender the
original permit, provisional license, or license or furnish satisfactory proof
of loss or destruction of the same.

The chief of police or a police officer shall
notify a holder that the holder's permit, provisional license, or license is
illegible and that the holder shall within ten days surrender the holder's
permit, provisional license, or license and apply for a duplicate. Upon
failure to comply with a notice to surrender an illegible permit, provisional
license, or license and apply for a duplicate, the person to whom the permit or
license is issued shall be subject to the penalties in section 286‑136.
[L 1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-117; am L 1970, c 164, §3; gen ch 1985; am L
1991, c 60, §3; am L 2005, c 72, §§11, 15; am L 2010, c 85, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next